Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB89.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "authorized users" and "information technology platform" in section 2 of the act of November 3, 2022 (P.L.2158, No.158), known as the Overdose Mapping Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819 "Authorized users." [Law enforcement officers and any other permitted users of the overdose information network, as determined by the Pennsylvania State Police, who are required to report overdoses and suspected overdoses to the network in accordance with this act.] Any of the following:(1) Law enforcement officers.(2) Permitted users of the overdose information network, as determined by the Pennsylvania State Police, who are required to report overdoses and suspected overdoses to the overdose information network in accordance with this act.(3) EMS providers who are required to report overdoses and suspected overdoses to an information technology platform as defined in this act.* * *" EMS provider. " As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions)."Information technology platform." As follows:(1) The [Overdose Information Network (ODIN)] overdose information network.(2) Any other platform approved by the Pennsylvania State Police to capture real-time overdose reporting or EMS provider reporting in accordance with section 4.1.(3) A PATIENT CARE REPORTS DATA COLLECTION SYSTEM AS OUTLINED UNDER 35 PA.C.S. CH. 81 (RELATING TO EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SYSTEM) UTILIZED BY AN EMS PROVIDER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 4.1.* * *Section 2. Section 3(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 3. Establishment and design.20250SB0089PN0945 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall launch an overdose information network for the purpose of electronically tracking known or suspected overdoses in this Commonwealth. The following apply:* * *(8) The Department of Health shall coordinate with the Pennsylvania State Police to ensure the prompt transfer into the overdose information network overdose information that was entered by an EMS provider under section 4.1(a) into an information technology platform other than the overdose information network . AND ENSURE THAT REPORTS FROM MULTIPLE AUTHORIZED USERS REGARDING THE SAME INCIDENT ARE IDENTIFIED AS SUCH.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Entry requirements for EMS providers.(a) Reporting by EMS providers.--Except as provided under subsection (d), an EMS provider who IS PROVIDING OR IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES ON BEHALF OF AN EMS AGENCY AND WHO encounters a known or suspected overdose shall access an information technology platform to report and document the incident in accordance with subsection (b) within 72 hours of the overdose.(b) Information reported.--When reporting a known or suspected overdose UNDER THIS SECTION , an authorized user shall document the following information in an information technology platform:(1) The date and time of the overdose.(2) The location where the overdose occurred.(3) The known or suspected controlled substances 20250SB0089PN0945 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administered to or inhaled, ingested, imbibed or injected by the overdose victim.(4) Whether an overdose reversal drug was administered and, if so, the type of overdose reversal drug administered, the number of doses administered and the method of administration.(5) Whether the confirmed or suspected overdose was fatal or nonfatal.(c) Other reporting requirements.--An authorized user's report of information about an overdose under this act does not preempt or replace any other reporting requirement of law applicable to the authorized user.(d) Exception.--An EMS provider who cannot access an information technology platform to comply with the 72-hour requirement under subsection (a) shall report the information under subsection (b) as soon as practicable.Section 4. This act shall take effect in six months.20250SB0089PN0945 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617